src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! Adverbs
!  -----
!! Adverbs in the Mundurukú language refer to time, space, manner.

LEXICON Adverbs
kapusu+Adv:kapusu  # "ontem" ;
g̃asũ+Adv:g̃asũ # "hoje" ;
g̃ebuje+Adv:g̃ebuje # "então" ;
kuy+Adv:kuy # "já" ;
kuyaje+Adv:kuyaje # "amanhã" ;
waram+Adv:waram # "outra-vez" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
